District of Columbia statutes.
23-322

Intent to defraud.

In an indictment or information in which it is necessary to allege an intent to defraud, it shall be sufficient to allege that the party accused did the act complained of with intent to defraud, without alleging an intent to defraud any particular person or body corporate. On the trial of such an indictment or information it shall not be necessary to prove an intent to defraud any particular person, but it shall be sufficient to prove a general intent to defraud.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 612, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Cross References

Forgery, see § 22-3241.
Fraud, see § 22-3821.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-322.
1973 Ed., § 23-322.